Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF37.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin REQUEST TO TERMINATE NORTHSTAR COMMUTER RAIL OPERATIONS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of transportation. new text end new text begin (c) "Council" means the Metropolitan Council. new text end new text begin (d) "FTA" means the Federal Transit Administration. new text end new text begin (e) "Northstar" means the Northstar Commuter Rail line that provides passenger rail service between downtown Minneapolis and Big Lake, including stops in Fridley, Coon Rapids, Anoka, Ramsey, and Elk River. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Federal approval. new text end new text begin Within 30 days of the enactment of this section, the council and the commissioner must request approval from the FTA to discontinue Northstar operations. As part of the request, the council and commissioner must specify that the state will not reimburse the FTA or any other federal agency for federal funds spent on Northstar. Within seven days of receiving a response to the request, the council and commissioner must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over transportation policy and finance on the outcome of the request. The report must include a copy of the request submitted to the FTA and a copy of the FTA's response. If the FTA grants the request, the commissioner and council must submit to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over transportation policy and finance a proposed plan to terminate Northstar operations. The plan must be submitted within 90 days after the FTA grants the request. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies in the counties of Anoka, Carver, Dakota, Hennepin, Ramsey, Scott, and Washington. new text end